Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4898.
peoplE of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 928. (1) For purposes of this article, boiler repairer licenses are classified as follows: (a) Class I. (b) Class III. (c) Class IV. (d) Class V. (e) Class P. (2) Beginning on the effective date of the amendatory act that added this section, an individual who has a class II license issued by the department is considered to have a class III license under this article. Sec. 928a. (1) The director shall not issue a license for a boiler repairer described under section 928 unless the applicant meets the requirements that are applicable to the classification of license for which the applicant is seeking licensure, as prescribed by rule. (2) Subject to subsection (3), the department shall promulgate rules to determine the requirements for each boiler repairer license classification described in section 928 under the administrative procedures act of 1969, 1969 PA 306, MCL 24.201 to 24.328. (3) The department shall not issue a class V license to an applicant unless the applicant submits evidence of both of the following: (a) Familiarity with and knowledge of federal rules and regulations applicable to the erection and repair of boilers that utilize a nuclear heat source. (b) Employment by a company in possession of a valid ASME N-type symbol stamp applicable to the portions of any nuclear boiler system the applicant proposes to repair. (4) Notwithstanding any other provision of this article, the department may by rule consolidate the licenses described in section 928 to reduce the number of boiler repairer licenses issued under this article. Sec. 928b. (1) An individual who is issued a class I license under this article may repair a boiler by means other than welding. (2) An individual who is issued a class III license under this article may do all of the following: (a) Repair a low-pressure boiler, a hot water supply boiler, and a fire tube boiler of any pressure. (b) Repair a high-pressure boiler. (c) Repair or replace non-boiler external piping. (d) Perform work covered by a class I license. (3) An individual who is issued a class IV license under this article may do all of the following: (a) Repair or field-erect a boiler of any pressure, except for a boiler that has a nuclear heat source. (b) Repair or replace non-boiler external piping. (c) Perform work covered by a class III license. (4) An individual who is issued a class V license under this article may do all of the following: (a) Erect and repair a boiler that has a nuclear heat source or the parts, source, appurtenances, or system components of a boiler that has a nuclear heat source. (b) Repair or replace non-boiler external piping. (c) Perform work covered by a class IV license. (5) An individual who is issued a class P license under this article may install or repair non-boiler external piping. (6) As used in this section, "non-boiler external piping" means piping, valves, fittings, and appurtenances that are external to a boiler and not part of the boiler proper or boiler external piping, as further defined by the department by rule through adoption of nationally recognized power-piping standards. Sec. 941. A person shall not repair a boiler without first obtaining a permit to repair the boiler from the boiler division of the department, unless the repair has been authorized by a licensed inspector pending issuance of the permit, or the repair is emergency maintenance performed by qualified welders regularly employed by a person that utilizes properly qualified welding procedures to weld on boilers owned and operated by the person. All of the following apply for purposes of the permit to repair requirement under this section: (a) A person is not eligible for a permit if the person is not licensed to repair boilers under this article.section 928a. (b) An individual shall not perform work for which a permit is required unless he or she the individual is licensed to repair boilers under this article, section 928a, or he or she the individual performs the work under the immediate supervision of an individual who is licensed to repair boilers under this article.section 928a. (c) A person shall obtain a permit by submitting an application to the department and including with the application a permit fee in an amount established by the department under article 4. However, a person is not required to pay a permit fee if the person utilizes properly qualified welding procedures and regularly employs qualified welders, registered with the boiler division of the department, to weld on boilers owned and operated by the person.